it: Finitura/superficie della lana: Antipilling; Spazzolato; Bifacciale; Micropile; Stile Minky; Stile Sherpa; Standard; Laminato antivento; Altro
fi: Fleeceviimeistely/‑pinta: Nyppyyntymätön; Harjattu; Kaksipuolinen; Mikrofleece; Minky-tyylinen; Sherpa-tyylinen; Vakio; Tuulenpitävä laminaatti; Muu
sl-SI: Končna obdelava/površina flisa: Proti muckanju; Krtačeno; Dvostransko; Mikroflis; Slog minky; Slog šerpa; Standardno; Laminat, odporen proti vetru; Drugo
cs: Flísová úprava / povrch: Protižmolková úprava; Počesaný; Oboustranný; Mikrofleece; Ve stylu minky; Ve stylu sherpa; Standardní; Větruodolný laminát; Ostatní
ja: フリース仕上げ／表面: アンチピリング; 起毛; 両面; マイクロフリース; ミンキー調; シェルパ調; スタンダード; 防風ラミネート; その他
en: Fleece finish / surface: Anti-pill; Brushed; Double-sided; Microfleece; Minky-style; Sherpa-style; Standard; Wind-resistant laminate; Other
es: Acabado o superficie de vellón: Antipilling; Cepillado; Doble cara; Micropolar; Estilo Minky; Estilo Sherpa; Estándar; Laminado resistente al viento; Otro
zh-TW: 刷毛布表面處理: 抗起毛球; 刷毛; 雙面; 超細刷毛; 仿貂絨; 仿羊羔絨; 標準; 抗風壓膜; 其他
nl: Fleece afwerking/oppervlak: Anti-pilling; Geborsteld; Dubbelzijdig; Microfleece; Minky-stijl; Sherpa-stijl; Standaard; Windbestendig laminaat; Overige
fr: Finition ou surface de la polaire: Anti-bouloche; Brossé; Double face; Micropolaire; Style Minky; Style Sherpa; Standard; Laminé coupe-vent; Autre
zh-CN: 抓绒表面/处理方式: 抗起球; 刷毛; 双面; 超细抓绒; 仿貂绒毛; 仿羊羔绒; 标准; 防风复合面料; 其他
ro-RO: Finisaj/suprafață de lână: Antiscămoșare; Periat; Pe două fețe; Microfleece; Stil minky; Stil sherpa; Standard; Laminat rezistent la vânt; Altele
el: Φινίρισμα / επιφάνεια από fleece: Anti-pill (δεν κομπιάζει); Βουρτσισμένο; Διπλής όψης; Μικροφλίς; Τύπου Minky; Τύπου Sherpa; Τυπικό; Laminate ανθεκτικό στον άνεμο; Άλλο
ru: Отделка поверхности флиса: Антипиллинг; С начесом; Двусторонний; Микрофлис; В стиле минки; В стиле шерпа; Стандартный; Ветрозащитный ламинат; Другое
vi: Hoàn thiện/bề mặt lông cừu: Chống xù lông; Chải xước; Hai mặt; Microfleece; Kiểu minky; Kiểu sherpa; Tiêu chuẩn; Màng ép chống gió; Khác
hu: Fleece felülete: Bolyhosodásmentes; Bolyhozott; Kétoldalas; Mikropolár; Minky stílusú; Sherpa stílusú; Normál; Szélálló laminált; Egyéb
nb: Fleece-overflate: Antinuppe; Børstet; Dobbeltsidig; Mikrofleece; Minky-stil; Sherpa-stil; Standard; Vindavvisende laminat; Annet
hr-HR: Završna obrada / površina od flisa: Protiv stvaranja mucica; Četkano; Dvostrano; Mikroflis; Stil minky; Stil sherpa; Standardno; Laminat otporan na vjetar; Ostalo
de: Fleece-Finish/Oberfläche: Anti-Pilling; Gebürstet; Doppelseitig; Mikrofleece; Minky-Stil; Sherpa-Stil; Standard; Windabweisendes Laminat; Sonstiges
sv: Fleece-finish / yta: Noppfri; Borstad; Dubbelsidig; Mikrofleece; Minky-stil; Sherpa-stil; Standard; Vindavvisande laminat; Övrigt
pt-PT: Acabamento/superfície em lã: Anti-pilling; Escovado; Dupla face; Micropolar; Estilo Minky; Estilo Sherpa; Padrão; Laminado resistente ao vento; Outro
sk-SK: Flísová úprava/povrch: Protižmolková; Česaná; Obojstranná; Mikrofleece; Štýl Minky; Štýl Sherpa; Štandardná; Laminát odolný voči vetru; Iné
da: Fleecefinish/-overflade: Anti-pilling; Børstet; Dobbeltsidet; Mikrofleece; Minky-stil; Sherpa-stil; Standard; Vindafvisende laminat; Andet
ko: 플리스 마감/표면: 보풀 방지; 브러시드; 양면; 마이크로플리스; 밍키 스타일; 셰르파 스타일; 표준; 방풍 라미네이트; 기타
th: พื้นผิว/ผิวสัมผัสแบบขนแกะ: กันขุย; ขูดขน; สองด้าน; ไมโครฟลีซ; สไตล์มิงกี้; สไตล์เชอร์ปา; มาตรฐาน; เคลือบลามิเนตกันลม; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Acabamento/superfície da lã: Antipeeling; Escovado; Dupla face; Microfleece; Estilo minky; Estilo sherpa; Padrão; Laminado resistente ao vento; Outro
bg-BG: Финиш/повърхност на руното: Против образуване на топчета; Развласена; Двустранна; Микрофлийс; Тип минки; Тип шерпа; Стандартна; Ветроустойчив ламинат; Друго
tr: Polar kumaş bitişi / yüzey türü: Tüylenme önleyici; Şardonlu; Çift taraflı; Mikro polar; Minky stili; Şerpa stili; Standart; Rüzgara dayanıklı laminat; Diğer
lt-LT: Fliso apdaila / paviršius: Nesiveliantis; Šukuotas; Dvipusis; Mikroflisas; „Minky“ stilius; Šerpos stiliaus; Standartinis; Vėjui atsparus laminatas; Kita
pl: Wykończenie/powierzchnia runa: Antypillingowe; Szczotkowane; Dwustronne; Mikropolar; W stylu minky; W stylu sherpa; Standardowe; Laminat wiatroodporny; Inne